Hawaii statutes.
[§304A-1503] Encouragement of federal
assistance. The governor, the president, and the board of regents are
authorized and requested to take any appropriate action to secure federal
assistance in strengthening the geophysics and planetology institute. [L 2006,
c 75, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next